test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ма: # Noun 'hammer / (fin) vasara' - partial paradigm /Type 1/ - ma
     ма+N+Sg+Nom: ма
     ма+N+Sg+Acc: мамʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Gen: маʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Dat: манʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Loc: махана
     ма+N+Sg+Abl: махад
     ма+N+Sg+Pros: мавна
     ма+N+Du+Nom: махаʼ
     ма+N+Du+Acc: махаʼ
     ма+N+Du+Gen: махаʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom: маˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Acc: ма
     ма+N+Pl+Gen: маˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Dat: махаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Loc: махаˮна
     ма+N+Pl+Abl: махат
     ма+N+Pl+Pros: маˮамна
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [мав, мами]
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [мав, мами]
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ман, мани]
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [махан, махани]
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [маханан, маханани]
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [махадан, махадани]
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [мавнан, мавнани]
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [махаюн, махаюни]
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [махаюн, махаюни]
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [махаюн, махаюни]
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ман, мани]
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ман, мани]
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [маˮан, маˮни]
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [махаˮн, махаˮни]
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [махаˮнан, махаˮнани]
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [махатан, махатани]
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [маˮамнан, маˮамнани]
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мар
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мамд
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: манд
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: маханд
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: махананд
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: махаданд
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: мавнанд
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: махаюд
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: махаюд
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: махают
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мад
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: мад
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мат
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: махат
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: махаˮнат
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: махатат
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: маˮамнат
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мада
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мамда
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: манда
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: маханда
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: махананда
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: махаданда
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: мавнанда
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: махаюда
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: махаюда
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: махаюта
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мада
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: мада
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мата
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: махата
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: махаˮната
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: махатата
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: маˮамната
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: мамиʼ
#     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: мами
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: мамиʼ
#     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: мами
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: маниʼ
#     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: мани
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: маханиʼ
#     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: махани
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: махананиʼ
#     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: маханани
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: махаданиʼ
#     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: махадани
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: мавнаниʼ
#     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: мавнани
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: махаюниʼ
#     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: махаюни
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: махаюниʼ
#     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: махаюни
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: махаюниʼ
#     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: махаюни
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: маниʼ
#     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: мани
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: маниʼ
#     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: мани
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: маˮниʼ
#     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: маˮни
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: махаˮниʼ
#     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: махаˮни
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: махаˮнаниʼ
#     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: махаˮнани
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: махатаниʼ
#     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: махатани
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: маˮамнаниʼ
#     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: маˮамнани
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: мариʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: мамдиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: мандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: махандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: маханандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: махадандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: мавнандиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: махаюдиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: махаюдиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: махаютиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: матиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: махатиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: махаˮнатиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: махататиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: маˮамнатиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: мамдиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: мандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: махандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: маханандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: махадандиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: мавнандиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: махаюдиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: махаюдиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: махаютиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: матиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: махатиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: махаˮнатиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: махататиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: маˮамнатиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: маваˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: маваˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: манаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: маханаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: махананаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: махаданаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: мавнанаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: махаюнаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: махаюнаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: махаюнаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: манаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: манаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: маˮнаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: махаˮнаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: махаˮнанаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: махатанаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: маˮамнанаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мараˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мамдаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мандаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: махандаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: маханандаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: махадандаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: мавнандаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: махаюдаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: махаюдаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: махаютаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мадаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мадаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: матаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: махатаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: махаˮнатаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: махататаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: маˮамнатаˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мадоʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мамдоʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мандоʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: махандоʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: маханандоʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: махадандоʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: мавнандоʼ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: махаюдоʼ
     ма+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: махаюдоʼ
     ма+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: махаютоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мадоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мадоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: матоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: махатоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: махаˮнатоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: махататоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: маˮамнатоʼ
     ма+N+Pred+Abs: мад
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [мадав, мадув, мадами, мадми]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [мадав, мадув, мадами, мадми]
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [мадан, мадани, мадни]
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: мадар
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: мадамд
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: маданд
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [мадада, мадда]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: мадамда
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: маданда
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [мадамиʼ, мадмиʼ]
#     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [мадами, мадми]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [мадамиʼ, мадмиʼ]
#     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [мадами, мадми]
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [маданиʼ, мадниʼ]
#     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [мадани, мадни]
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [мадариʼ, мадриʼ]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: мадамдиʼ
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: мадандиʼ
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [мададиʼ, маддиʼ]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: мадамдиʼ
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: мадандиʼ
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [мадаваˮ, мадваˮ]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [мадаваˮ, мадваˮ]
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [маданаˮ, маднаˮ]
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [мадараˮ, мадраˮ]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: мадамдаˮ
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: мадандаˮ
     ма+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [мададоʼ, маддоʼ]
     ма+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: мадамдоʼ
     ма+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: мадандоʼ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: мадмʼ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ман
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ма
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: маниʼ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаʼ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: маваˮ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мадаˮ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: маˮ
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: мадамзь
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: манась
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мась
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: манинзь
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: мадинзь
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: маханзь
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: маваць
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: мадаць
     ма+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: маць
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мав
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мар
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мада
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мамиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мариʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: маваˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мараˮ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мадоʼ
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мавась
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: марась
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мадась
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: маминзь
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: маринзь
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мадинзь
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: маваць
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мараць
     ма+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мадонзь
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюн
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюд
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюда
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюниʼ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюдиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюдиʼ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюнаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюдаˮ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: махаюдоʼ
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюнась
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюдась
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюдась
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюнинзь
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюдинзь
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюдинзь
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюнаць
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюдаць
     ма+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: махаюдонзь
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ман
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мад
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мада
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: маниʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мадиʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: манаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мадаˮ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мадоʼ
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: манась
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мадась
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мадась
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: манинзь
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мадинзь
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мадинзь
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: манаць
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мадаць
     ма+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мадонзь
     ма+N+Tra: маӈэ
     ма+N+Car: масиˮ
     ма+N+Equ: мадремʼ
     ма+N+Equ+Lat: мадревʼ
